Maryland, session 2025, HB0679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
4–408.
THE AUTHORITY SHALL DESIGN AND LOCATE THE ENTRANCES AND EXITS TO
THE NEW BRIDGE OVER THE PATAPSCO RIVER THAT WILL REPLACE THE
COLLAPSED FRANCIS SCOTT KEY BRIDGE, AND THE ASSOCIATED ROADS, TO
ENSURE THAT A VEHICLE THAT WILL NOT CROSS THE BRIDGE IS NOT REQUIRED TO
PAY A TOLL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0679*